Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 1 Hunting

Cross references.

Prohibition against killing, harming, removing or disturbing wildlife found in a cave, §

12-4-146

.

Cruelty to animals, §

16-12-4

.

Liability of landowner or hunter for wildlife injured crossing public roadway, § 51-1-52.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hunting regulations, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Subject 391-4-2.